Maryland, session 2025, HB0781.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated unless a
different meaning is clearly intended from the context.
(u) “Elderly” means 65 years of age or older.
10–206.
(e) The State Board shall provide election judges with uniform statewide training
on the voting system, including:
(1) all features of the voting system that provide access to voters with
disabilities; and
(2) the rights of voters with disabilities, including those rights guaranteed
by State and federal law.
(F) THE TRAINING PROGRAM SHALL INCLUDE INSTRUCTION ON BEST
PRACTICES FOR ASSISTING THE GUIDELINES FOR EXPEDITING VOTING FOR
ELDERLY VOTERS AND VOTERS WITH DISABILITIES, AS DEFINED IN THE FEDERAL
AMERICANS WITH DISABILITIES ACT, AS REQUIRED ESTABLISHED UNDER §
10–310.1 OF THIS TITLE.
[(f)] (G) Each local board shall conduct election judge training based on the
program developed by the State Board.
[(g)] (H) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, each
election judge shall participate in the training program provided for in subsection (a) of this
section.
(2) An election judge who is appointed under emergency circumstances is
not required to attend the course of instruction.

HOUSE BILL 781 3
10–310.1.
(A) THE STATE BOARD SHALL ESTABLISH GUIDELINES FOR THE LOCAL
BOARDS TO IMPLEMENT A PROCESS TO ACCOMMODATE AND EXPEDITE VOTING FOR
ELDERLY VOTERS AND VOTERS WITH DISABILITIES, AS DEFINED IN THE FEDERAL
AMERICANS WITH DISABILITIES ACT, AT EACH EARLY VOTING CENTER AND
POLLING PLACE IN THE STATE.
(B) THE GUIDELINES ESTABLISHED BY THE STATE BOARD UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) DEDICATED EXPEDITED LINES FOR ELDERLY VOTERS AND
VOTERS WITH DISABILITIES; AND
(2) CLEARLY MARKED SIGNAGE INDICATING THE AVAILABILITY OF
EXPEDITED SERVICES;
(3) PRIORITY SEATING FOR ELDERLY VOTERS AND VOTERS WITH
DISABILITIES IN WAITING AREAS; AND
(4) SPECIFIC PROVISIONS FOR HIGH–TRAFFIC EARLY VOTING
CENTERS AND POLLING PLACES.
(C) THE LOCAL BOARDS SHALL:
(1) IMPLEMENT THE GUIDELINES ESTABLISHED BY THE STATE
BOARD UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) COLLECT FEEDBACK FROM ELDERLY VOTERS AND VOTERS WITH
DISABILITIES ON THE ACCOMMODATIONS AND EXPEDITED VOTING PROCESS WHILE
VOTING AT EARLY VOTING CENTERS AND POLLING PLACES IS IN PROGRESS AND
MAKE IMMEDIATE ADJUSTMENTS TO THE PROCESS AS NECESSARY.
(D) THE STATE BOARD SHALL MONITOR THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE
GUIDELINES ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION BY THE LOCAL
BOARDS AND SUBMIT A REPORT ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 15 EACH YEAR
IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING A STATEWIDE ELECTION TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE THAT
INCLUDES:
(1) ANY CHALLENGES TO IMPLEMENTING THE GUIDELINES; AND

HOUSE BILL 781
(2) AN ANALYSIS OF THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE ACCOMMODATIONS
AND EXPEDITED VOTING PROCESS;
(3) A SUMMARY OF FEEDBACK ON THE ACCOMMODATIONS AND
EXPEDITED VOTING PROCESS FROM ELDERLY VOTERS AND VOTERS WITH
DISABILITIES; AND
(4) (2) ANY RECOMMENDATIONS TO IMPROVE THE GUIDELINES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the guidelines required under
§ 10–310.1 of the Election Law Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act:
(1) shall be implemented beginning with the statewide primary election
held in 2026; and
(2) are not required to be implemented for any special elections that may
occur before the statewide primary election held in 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.